Utah statutes.
13-34-201.   Fraudulent educational credentials.

(1)  A person may not use, give, or receive, or attempt or conspire to do so, in connection with a business, trade, profession, or occupation, a degree or other document which has been purchased, obtained, fraudulently or illegally issued, counterfeited, materially altered, or found, or which serves to evidence the undertaking or completion of scholastic achievement if the education has not been undertaken and attained.

(2)  A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

